California, session 20252026, AB1610.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2225 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2225. (a) (1) Based on change-of-address data received from the United States Postal Service or its licensees, the county elections official shall send a forwardable notice, including a postage-paid and preaddressed return form, to enable the voter to verify or correct address information.(2) If notification received through NCOA or Operation Mail or a returned mailing indicates that a voter has moved and has given no forwarding address or indicates that a voter has moved out of the state, the county elections official shall send a forwardable notice in substantially the same format as the notice set forth in Section 20507(d)(2) of Title 52 of the United States Code.(b) (1) If postal service change-of-address data indicates that the voter has moved to a new residence address in California, or if a voter’s mailing address is no longer valid as described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2), the forwardable notice shall be in substantially one of the two following forms:(A) If the voter’s residence address changed:“We have received notification that you have moved to a new residence address in California or that your mailing address is no longer valid. California. Your voter registration record has been updated to this new address. If this is correct, you do not have to take any action. If this is incorrect, you can notify our office by either returning the attached postage-paid postcard, or by calling toll free; you must notify us at least 15 days prior to the next election or you may be required to vote using a provisional ballot.”(B) If the voter’s mailing address changed:“We have received notification that you have moved to a new residence address in California or that your mailing address is no longer valid. Your mailing address has been updated. If this is correct, you do not have to take any action. If this is incorrect, you can notify our office by either returning the attached postage-paid postcard or by calling toll-free; you must notify us at least 15 days prior to the next election, or you may be required to vote using a provisional ballot.”(2) If a voter has a mailing address different from their residence address, and postal service change-of-address data indicates that the voter’s mailing address is no longer valid, the county elections official shall take one of the following steps:(A) If a new mailing address is provided, the county elections official shall send the forwardable notice described in paragraph (1) to the voter’s new mailing address and update the voter’s registration record to add the new mailing address.(B) If a new mailing address is not provided and the voter lives in an area where the voter can receive mail at their residence address, the county elections official shall send the forwardable notice described in paragraph (1) to the voter’s residence address and update the voter’s registration record to remove the mailing address that is no longer valid.(C) If a new mailing address is not provided and the voter lives in an area where the voter cannot receive mail at their residence address, the county elections official shall send a forwardable notice in substantially the same format as the notice set forth in Section 20507(d)(2) of Title 52 of the United States Code.(c) If postal service change-of-address data received from a nonforwardable mailing indicates that a voter has moved and left no forwarding address or indicates that a voter has moved out of the state, a forwardable notice shall be sent in substantially the same format as the notice set forth in Section 20507(d)(2) of Title 52 of the United States Code.(d) The use of a toll-free number to confirm the old residence address is optional. Any change to the voter address must be received in writing.(e) Upon the mailing of the forwardable address confirmation notice described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) to a voter, the county elections official shall not update the status of the voter’s registration to inactive.(f) Upon the mailing of the forwardable address confirmation notice described in subdivision (c) or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) to a voter, the county elections official shall update the status of the voter’s registration to inactive.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.